Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-220. Monitoring of changes made in federal income tax laws and regulations — Reports of secretary.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall monitor changes made in federal income tax laws and regulations for the purpose of determining how the changes may affect Arkansas income tax law and for the purpose of determining how the changes differ from provisions adopted for Arkansas income tax purposes.

The secretary shall report his or her findings annually to the House Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation and may make such other reports to the House Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation as he or she deems necessary.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Reports of secretary” for “Reports of director” in the section heading; substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (b).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 20, provided:

“(a)There is hereby created a special House committee to be composed of nine House members, including the Speaker or his designate, four to be appointed by the Speaker (one selected from each caucus district) and four from the House Budget Committee, one from each caucus district, as appointed by the Chairman of the House Budget Committee. The Speaker shall appoint the Chairman of the committee. The committee may employ, using positions in Section 1, a Director of Constituency Services and four Legislative Analysts to staff an Office of House Constituency Services, to be under the direction of the House Performance Review Committee. The Bureau shall provide support staff for the Office. The committee may also employ, using positions in Section 1, ten Legislative Analysts and five secretaries for House committees and a Management Project Analyst for the purpose of coordinating the House Committee activities. If additional staff are required for the Office or the committees, the special committee may utilize positions in the contingency pool provided for in this act. For purposes of this act, the staff of the House committees and the staff of the House Constituency Services Office shall be Bureau employees.

“(b)The Senate Efficiency Committee may employ, using positions in Section 1, a Director of Constituency Services and two Legislative Analysts to staff an Office of Senate Constituency Services. The Bureau shall provide support staff for the Office. The committee may also employ, using positions in Section 1, five Legislative Analysts and five secretaries for Senate committees. If additional staff are required for the Office or the committees, the Senate Efficiency Committee may utilize positions in the contingency pool provided for in this act. For purposes of this act, the staff of the Senate committees and the staff of the Senate Constituency Services Office shall be Bureau employees.”

Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 21, provided:

“In the event that an elected Constitutional Officer relocates his/her office and related staff from the State Capitol Building, and does not have authorized in his/her authorized biennial appropriation act an amount sufficient to expend for rent, then the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Arkansas Legislative Council may expend from appropriations authorized for the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Arkansas Legislative Council such additional funds as required to assist such elected Constitutional Officer for such additional rent. The Secretary of State and the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall jointly decide who shall occupy the vacated areas.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 15, provided:

“As soon as possible after the effective date of this act and from time to time thereafter, the chairman and vice chairman of the Legislative Council, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, meeting jointly with the chairman of the Joint Budget Committee shall determine the distribution of funds appropriated for ad interim committees' per diem, mileage, and out-of-state travel to the separate House and Senate committees herein for the remainder of this biennial period. In the event that one person occupies two or more of the above named positions, they shall appoint a member of their house to serve as their representative in one of the positions.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 16, provided:

“Nothing in this act shall affect any statutorily created subcommittee of a joint interim committee.”

Cross References. Institute of Legislative Procedure, §10-2-123.

Preambles. Acts 1949, No. 264 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, it is practically impossible for the General Assembly, during its sixty days session every two years, to make and keep adequate check upon and to secure sufficient, accurate and detailed information upon the operations of the state government, and all of its departments, institutions, boards, commissions and affairs to enable its members to be properly informed as to the operations thereof, the adequacy or inadequacy of appropriations made and the manner of their expenditures and the basis and necessity of appropriation requests thereafter to be presented to the General Assembly, and

“Whereas, proper investigation and audit of the affairs and operations of the state government, its departments, institutions, boards and commissions by an agency of the General Assembly is necessary in the interest of intelligent and informed action by the members of the General Assembly in future legislation and for the best interest of the people of this state….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1949, No. 264, § 13: approved Mar. 9, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “Since it is apparent that a Joint Legislative Committee is needed, and since it is believed that a greater contribution to the efficient administration of state affairs can be accomplished by a Legislative Committee composed exclusively of members of the General Assembly, and since there are many matters which should be considered by the Joint Legislative Committee immediately upon adjournment of this General Assembly; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1951, No. 230, § 4: approved Mar. 1, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “Since it is apparent that changes in the law creating the Joint Legislative Committee are needed, and since it is believed that a greater contribution to the efficient administration of state affairs can be accomplished by a Legislative Committee composed exclusively of members of the General Assembly, and the provision for alternates to serve in the place of members who are not reelected to the General Assembly, and since there are many matters which should be considered by the Joint Legislative Committee immediately upon adjournment of this General Assembly; Now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1955, No. 247, § 4: Mar. 15, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “Since it is apparent that changes in the law creating the Joint Legislative Committee are needed, and since it is believed that a greater contribution to the efficient administration of state affairs can be accomplished by a Legislative Committee composed exclusively of members of the General Assembly, and provision is needed for alternates to serve in the place of members who are not reelected to the General Assembly, and since there are many matters which should be considered by the Joint Legislative Committee immediately upon the adjournment of this General Assembly; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 303, § 2: Mar. 26, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “Since it is apparent that changes in the law creating the Joint Legislative Committee are needed, and since it is believed that a greater contribution to the efficient administration of state affairs can be accomplished by a reorganized Legislative Committee, and provision is needed for alternates to serve in the place of members who are not reelected to the General Assembly, and since there are many matters which should be considered by the Joint Legislative Committee immediately upon the adjournment of this General Assembly; now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 41, § 2: Sept. 8, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Legislative Council conducts numerous studies of governmental problems, that said studies play a vital role in the improvement of government in this state, and that gifts, grants, contributions and donations as authorized in this act will provide much needed additional funds for carrying out such vital studies. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 253, § 4: Mar. 18, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Legislative Committee created by Act 264 of 1949, and which is designated as the Legislative Council, has many matters of pressing importance to be considered, that said committee will be appointed during the Regular Session of the General Assembly and will meet upon adjournment of the General Assembly and that establishment of an adequate and proper per diem as an expense allowance for attending meetings of said committee is necessary for the proper discharge of the duties of said committee. Now, therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 411, § 3: Mar. 20, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a majority of the members of the Legislative Council are selected by caucus of the members of the House of Representatives from each of the six congressional districts as established by Act 297 of 1951; that such manner of selection was designed to assure that the membership of the Legislative Council would be composed of a broad cross-section of the members of the House of Representatives from the various areas of the state and would represent the views of the members of the House of Representatives from the various sections of the state; that there is some uncertainty in the present law regarding whether or not the two members of each district selected by caucus must be from different counties of the district, and that this act will clarify the law in this respect; that the members of the Legislative Council will be selected sometime prior to the adjournment of the Sixty-Fifth General Assembly and that it is desirable that this act become effective immediately in order to clarify this situation prior to the selection of such members. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 500, § 5: Mar. 20, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Bureau of Legislative Research of the Legislative Council performs many services vital to the legislative process of this state and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to clarify the duties of said bureau with respect to the Legislative Council and to the members of the General Assembly, and it is further necessary that this act be immediately passed in order to clarify the duties of the Legislative Council with respect to studies to be undertaken at the direction of the General Assembly in order that such studies might be undertaken immediately upon adjournment of the General Assembly, to enable the compilation of adequate information and to hold hearings in connection therewith in order to conclude said studies for use by the next session of the General Assembly or by any special session of the General Assembly that may be called in the near future. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 86, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Feb. 13, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the membership of the Legislative Council is not large enough to permit an equitable distribution of its members among the various sections of the state, and that an equitable distribution of the members thereof is necessary in order that the various sections of the state and the various interests in each section can be properly represented, and that this act will correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 107, § 3: Feb. 20, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that under the laws of this state the members of the House and Senate from each of the six congressional districts established by Act 297 of 1951 are to caucus for the selection of members and alternate members of the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; that the reapportionment of the seats of the House and Senate has resulted in a number of members of the House and Senate being elected from Representative or Senatorial districts that comprise counties in more than one congressional district; and, that immediate clarification of the method to be followed in the conduct of the respective caucuses for the selection of such members and alternates is essential in order that each of these two important joint ad interim committees of the General Assembly may be properly selected during the current Regular Session of the General Assembly as required by law. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 292, § 4: Mar. 15, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the functions and duties of the Legislative Council in conducting interim research studies for the benefit of the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly, and in reviewing the budgetary needs of the various agencies of government in order to prepare recommendations to the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly with respect to the budget for each of the respective state agencies, indicates a need for the designation of two members of the General Assembly, one from the House of Representatives and one from the Senate, to serve on the Legislative Council as spokesmen for the Governor and in order to report to the Governor, and to convey to the Council the recommendations of the Governor on matters being studied by the Legislative Council, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to expedite the selection of members of the Legislative Council, as required by law, prior to the adjournment of the Sixty-Eighth General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 929, § 3: Apr. 8, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the Arkansas Legislative Council and the Arkansas Joint Auditing Committee have many matters of pressing importance to be considered, that said committees will be selected during the Regular Session of the General Assembly and will meet upon adjournment of the General Assembly and that establishment of an adequate and proper per diem, expense allowance and mileage reimbursement for attending meetings of such committees is necessary for the proper discharge of the duties of said committees. Now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 84, § 4: Feb. 25, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that the House of Representatives and Senate select their members to the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee from the old six congressional districts; that the selection from the present four congressional districts would be more equitable; that the selection is to be made prior to adjournment of this legislative session; and therefore, this act must go into effect as soon as possible to grant the House and Senate the authority to change the method of selection of its members to the Legislative Council and the Joint Auditing Committee. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 832, § 7: Mar. 27, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present composition of the Joint Budget Committee is in immediate need of change; this act so provides; and that this act shall go into effect immediately in order to change the membership of the Joint Budget Committee prior to the adjournment of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1055, § 24: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 542, § 7: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act affects the method of selection of members of the House of Representatives to the Legislative Council, Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Joint Budget Committee; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide for the proper selection of such members during the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 607, § 36: approved Mar. 13, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that payees listed in this Act may be entitled to the sums appropriated and transferred to herein, and that they have been deprived of the use of these funds for a long period of time, and that further delay in paying these just debts of the State would do harm to the reputation of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 993, § 18: Apr. 6, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that payees listed in this Act may be entitled to the sums appropriated and transferred to herein, and that they have been deprived of the use of these funds for a long period of time, and that further delay in paying these just debts of the State would do harm to the reputation of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1312, § 36: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, Sections 9 as added by House Amendment 1, 12 as added by House Amendment 4, and 15 through 19 as added by House Amendment 10 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 24: Oct. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to the operation of interim committees of the General Assembly unduly restricts the interim work of the General Assembly by authorizing committees to meet only as joint committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate; that in order to enable the Senate and House of Representatives to efficiently and effectively perform their interim duties, it is necessary that the interim committees of each house be authorized to meet either jointly or separately and that this act should be given effect immediately to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 29: became law without Governor's signature. Noted Oct. 19, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly meeting in First Extraordinary Session, that payees listed in this Act may be entitled to the sums appropriated and transferred herein, and that they have been deprived of the use of these funds for a long period of time, and that further delay in paying these just debts of the State would do harm to the reputation of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1285, § 32: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety Section 10 of this act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, Section 10 shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, Section 10 shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto. The remaining sections of this act shall become effective from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 466, § 9: Feb. 28, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should now have co-chairpersons and co-vice chairpersons instead of a chairperson and vice-chairperson; that this act so provides; that these officers will be selected by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee as soon as it organizes after the adjournment of this regular session; and that unless this act goes into effect immediately, the Committee will not be able to select its co-chairpersons until perhaps months after its initial meeting. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2100, § 22: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2005 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2005 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 38, § 4: Apr. 11, 2006. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current Arkansas law does not provide sufficient information on the cost of administrative rules promulgated by the State Board of Education and the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities; and that this bill will provide critical information on the cost of administrative rules to public school districts and will minimize the possibility of the placement of unfunded mandates upon public school districts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, Nos. 605 and 606, § 27: Mar. 25, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of Arkansas overwhelmingly approved the establishment of lotteries at the 2008 General Election; that lotteries will provide funding for scholarships to the citizens of this state; that the failure to immediately implement this act will cause a reduction in lottery proceeds that will harm the educational and economic success of potential students eligible to receive scholarships under the act; and that the state lotteries should be implemented as soon as possible to effectuate the will of the citizens of this state and implement lottery-funded scholarships as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 273 § 2: Mar. 15, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Legislative Council conducts continuing review of administrative rules during the interim to allow the General Assembly to take remedial steps to correct abuses of rulemaking authority or clarify legislative intent at legislative sessions; that this review ceases during a regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session of the General Assembly, creating a gap in this vital legislative function; and that legislative review of administrative rules should be possible during a regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session to allow the General Assembly to maintain awareness of agency actions and be prepared to correct abuses of rulemaking authority or clarify legislative intent when the General Assembly is in session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 23: July 1, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas bridges and roads are in need of repair and proper maintenance; that the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads are necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety; that increased funding is essential to the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads; that this act is designed to provide the necessary funding that is essential to the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads, and this act is necessary because without this increased funding, the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads may not be performed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1-8, 13, 15, 18-21 of this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

Acts 2017, No. 737, § 15: Mar. 29, 2017, §11. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2017 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, with the exception that Section 11 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2017, with the exception that Section 11 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2017, with the exception that Section 11 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Ark. L. Rev.

Powers, Separation of Powers: The Unconstitutionality of the Arkansas Legislative Council, 36 Ark. L. Rev. 124.

The Senate shall select sixteen (16) members in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Rules of the Senate;

The House of Representatives shall select twenty (20) members in accordance with the procedure prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore Designate, the immediate past President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker Designate of the House of Representatives, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the immediate past Speaker of the House of Representatives, the immediate past cochairs of the Legislative Council, the immediate past chair or cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and the chair and vice chair or cochairs and co-vice chairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall be ex officio members of the Legislative Council and shall enjoy the same rights and privileges as other Legislative Council members.

If the immediate past Speaker of the House of Representatives is not a member of the House, the current Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the stead of the immediate past Speaker of the House of Representatives.

If the immediate past President Pro Tempore of the Senate is not a member of the Senate, the current President Pro Tempore of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the immediate past President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

If the immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative Council is not a member of the House, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the stead of the immediate past House cochair.

If the immediate past Senate Cochair of the Legislative Council is not a member of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the immediate past Senate cochair.

If the immediate past House Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the House, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve in the stead of the immediate past House cochair.

If the immediate past Senate Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not a member of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may appoint a member of the Senate to serve in the stead of the immediate past Senate cochair.

If the House Cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has not been elected, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve until the House members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee elect a cochair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

If the House Co-vice Chair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee has not been elected, the Speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a member of the House to serve until the House members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee elect a co-vice chair of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee;

The majority party leader and minority party leader of the House or their designees, and the majority party leader and the minority party leader in the Senate or their designees shall be members of the Legislative Council and shall enjoy the same rights and privileges as other Legislative Council members.

If the majority party leader or the minority party leader in the House elects to designate a person to serve, that designation shall be subject to confirmation by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

If the majority party leader or the minority party leader in the Senate elects to designate a person to serve, that designation shall be subject to confirmation by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

The majority party whip and minority party whip in the Senate or their designees and the majority party whip and the minority party whip in the House or their designees shall be members of the Legislative Council and shall enjoy the same rights and privileges as other Legislative Council members.
